Rhode Island, session 2026, HB8246.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Chapter 27-18 of the General Laws entitled "Accident and Sickness Insurance
Policies" is hereby amended by adding thereto the following section:
27-18-96. Insurance coverage for lung cancer screening.
(a) The Rhode Island general assembly recognizes that lung cancer remains the leading
cause of cancer deaths in Rhode Island and further that early detection of lung cancer will ensure
that patients get the critical care they need without delay. Accordingly, it is in the best interests of
the people of the state to promote widespread availability by eliminating out-of-pocket costs for
lung cancer screenings.
(b) Every individual or group health insurance contract, plan, or policy that provides
coverage and that is delivered, issued for delivery, prescribed, or renewed in this state on or after
January 1, 2027, shall provide coverage for follow-up screening or diagnostic services for lung
cancer upon the recommendation of a health care provider acting within the provider's scope of
practice, and as recommended by current American Cancer Society guidelines for lung cancer
screening. There shall be no copayment required, and no deductible shall need to be met for follow-
up screening or diagnostic services for lung cancer. A deductible may be applied to health plans
that are paired with a federally qualified health savings account pursuant to 26 U.S.C. § 223.
Nothing in this section would prohibit a health plan from implementing this benefit prior to January
1, 2027.
(c) Nothing in this section shall be construed to prevent medical management or utilization

review of the services, including preauthorization, to ensure that such services are consistent with
current American Cancer Society guidelines for lung cancer screening.
SECTION 2. Chapter 27-19 of the General Laws entitled "Nonprofit Hospital Service
Corporations" is hereby amended by adding thereto the following section:
27-19-88. Insurance coverage for lung cancer screening.
(a) The Rhode Island general assembly recognizes that lung cancer remains the leading
cause of cancer deaths in Rhode Island and further that early detection of lung cancer will ensure
that patients get the critical care they need without delay. Accordingly, it is in the best interests of
the people of the state to promote widespread availability by eliminating out-of-pocket costs for
lung cancer screenings.
(b) Every individual or group health insurance contract, plan, or policy that provides
coverage and that is delivered, issued for delivery, prescribed, or renewed in this state on or after
January 1, 2027, shall provide coverage for all follow-up screening or diagnostic services for lung
cancer that are administered at a frequency identified in the current American Cancer Society
guidelines, including follow up examinations. Follow up examinations include, but are not limited
to, chest x-ray, computed tomography scan, magnetic resonance imaging, positron emission
tomography, or biopsy. There shall be no copayment, coinsurance, or any other cost-sharing
required, and no deductible shall need to be met for follow-up screening or diagnostic services for
lung cancer. A deductible may be applied to health plans that are paired with a federally qualified
health savings account pursuant to 26 U.S.C. § 223. Nothing in this section would prohibit a health
plan from implementing this benefit prior to January 1, 2027.
(c) Nothing in this section shall be construed to prevent medical management or utilization
review of the services, including preauthorization, to ensure that such services are consistent with
current American Cancer Society guidelines for lung cancer screening.
SECTION 3. Chapter 27-20 of the General Laws entitled "Nonprofit Medical Service
Corporations" is hereby amended by adding thereto the following section:
27-20-84. Insurance coverage for lung cancer screening.
(a) The Rhode Island general assembly recognizes that lung cancer remains the leading
cause of cancer deaths in Rhode Island and further that early detection of lung cancer will ensure
that patients get the critical care they need without delay. Accordingly, it is in the best interests of
the people of the state to promote widespread availability by eliminating out-of-pocket costs for
lung cancer screenings.
(b) Every individual or group health insurance contract, plan, or policy that provides
coverage and that is delivered, issued for delivery, prescribed, or renewed in this state on or after
LC005999 - Page 2 of 5

January 1, 2027, shall provide coverage for all follow-up screening or diagnostic services for lung
cancer upon the recommendation of a health care provider acting within the provider's scope of
practice, and as recommended by current American Cancer Society guidelines for lung cancer
screening. There shall be no copayment, coinsurance, or any other cost-sharing required, and no
deductible shall need to be met for follow-up screening or diagnostic services for lung cancer. A
deductible may be applied to health plans that are paired with a federally qualified health savings
account pursuant to 26 U.S.C. § 223. Nothing in this section would prohibit a health plan from
implementing this benefit prior to January 1, 2027.
(c) Nothing in this section shall be construed to prevent medical management or utilization
review of the services, including preauthorization, to ensure that such services are consistent with
current American Cancer Society guidelines for lung cancer screening.
SECTION 4. Chapter 27-41 of the General Laws entitled "Health Maintenance
Organizations" is hereby amended by adding thereto the following section:
27-41-101. Insurance coverage for lung cancer screening.
(a) The Rhode Island general assembly recognizes that lung cancer remains the leading
cause of cancer deaths in Rhode Island and further that early detection of lung cancer will ensure
that patients get the critical care they need without delay. Accordingly, it is in the best interests of
the people of the state to promote widespread availability by eliminating out-of-pocket costs for
lung cancer screenings.
(b) Every individual or group health insurance contract, plan, or policy that provides
coverage and that is delivered, issued for delivery, prescribed, or renewed in this state on or after
January 1, 2027, shall provide coverage for all follow-up screening or diagnostic services for lung
cancer that are administered at a frequency identified in the current American Cancer Society
guidelines, including follow up examinations. Follow up examinations include, but are not limited
to, chest x-ray, computed tomography scan, magnetic resonance imaging, positron emission
tomography, or biopsy. There shall be no copayment, coinsurance, or any other cost-sharing
required, and no deductible shall need to be met for follow-up screening or diagnostic services for
lung cancer. A deductible may be applied to health plans that are paired with a federally qualified
health savings account pursuant to 26 U.S.C. § 223. Nothing in this section would prohibit a health
plan from implementing this benefit prior to January 1, 2027.
(c) Nothing in this section shall be construed to prevent medical management or utilization
review of the services, including preauthorization, to ensure that such services are consistent with
current American Cancer Society guidelines for lung cancer screening.
LC005999 - Page 3 of 5

SECTION 5. This act shall take effect upon passage.
========
LC005999
========
LC005999 - Page 4 of 5